ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/nl_NL/hyph_nl_NL.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.3
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN -
1-1
NEXTLEVEL
i9ë/=e,2,1
e9ë/=e,2,1
o9ë/=e,2,1
u9ï/=i,2,1
o9ï/=i,2,1
e9ï/=i,2,1
a9ï/=i,2,1
o9ö/=o,2,1
l9ë/=e,2,1
a9ë/=e,2,1
e9ü/=u,2,1
u9ü/=u,2,1
uu2
u9utje/=,2,1
oo2
o9otje/=,2,1
e9etje/é=,1,2
aa2
2aatj
a9atje/=,2,1
uit9je/t=t,3,1
u2it
er1tj
ert9je/t=t,3,1
9'tje/=,1,1
9’tje/=,1,1
.depoo9tj2e./t=,5,1
.1de
.de1po
.depoo2
.depo9otje/=,5,1
.a2
.aan1
.aa2
.2a1l1o
.as1t
.as1p
.an1gl
.a4br
.a1b
.a3ka
.laat3ste
.laa2
.lo1v
.le3r2
.lu2i1t4
.m2
.m2aat2j
.1ma
.3maat
.maa2
.me2t1j
.1me
.o2
.om1s
.oes1
.on1a
.on1o
.on1ee
.o1ne
.o1n3i
.o2n2t
.on1te4
.ont3eren
.onte1re
.op1r
.e2
.een1e
.e1s1c
.es1p
.ent1j
.e2nt
.e2i1t
.ed1s
.ed1w
.er1aa2
.er1on
.e1r1i
.e1r1u
.ek1
.eu1
.ex3ame2n.
.exa1me
.ex3amen2s.
.exame2ns
.s2
.sa1c
.n2
.1na3g2
.net1j
.1b2
.bli2
.be1a
.i2
.in1
.ij2s1
.do1v
.di1a1b
.1di
.t2
.taart3j
.taa2
.tent3j
.te2nt
.ts2
.g2
.go1v
.ge1n
.1ge
.ve2
.vent3j
.ve2nt
.vi3c
.1vi
.ro1v
.rij1t
.f2
.fo1li
.1fo
.j2
.k2
.ker2s
.1ke
.ku3re
.1ku
.ku2r
.u2
.ui2
.ui3tj
.u2it
.p2
.pet1j
.piet3j
.we2l
.x1
a1aap
aaa2
aal1a2
aal3ste
aa2ls
aa1m1a
aam1p
aas1a
1aan1ta
aa2nt
aan1tj
aan1g
1aan1vr
aan1v
1aan1j
aan1k
aat1a
aa1t1o
aat1r
aat1h
aa1r1a2
aar1o
aa1r1e
2aars
aa1r1i
a1laa2
a1lag
2a1lo
alo2n
al1op
a1le
a2l1el
al1ex
al1sl
a2ls
a1li
1a2lik
al1do
al1un
al1ui
al1po
a2lp
a1ly
am1to1
a1oo2
a1oe
a1os
a1on
a1ot
a1op
ae1
a1saa2
a1sal
as1lo
as1li
as1m
a2s1op
a2s1e2t
a1se
as1ef
asie2
a1si
as1ta.
as1too2
as1tor
as1te
as1tri
a2st1h
as1tu
a1sja
as1jo
as1co
as1ha
as1ho
a1su
as1pa
as1pl
as1pen
as1pi
as1pr
azi2n
a1z
an2aa2
an1av
an1ar1c
an1ac
a1ne
an1est
an1enc
ane2n
a2n1ei
an1sl
a2ns
ans1oo2
an1sn
ans3tad
ans2t
an1sta
ans3t2e.
an1ste
ans1pi
a1ni
2an1da
and3er1v
an1de
and2ste
and1st
an1dri
antal4
a2nt
an1ta
an1th
an1go
ang1sl
an2gs
an2kaa2
an1ka
an1c
an1ui
a1ny
ab1lo
a1b
ai2l
ai3le
ail2de
ai1o
ai1e
ais2
ai1so
ai1s1te
aid2
ai1tj
a2it
a1ij
ad1aa2
a1da
ad1se2
ad1spr
ad1w
a1taa2
a1tal
a2t1ad
a1tat
at1ach
a1to
a1te
a2te1s
ats1l
at2sn
ats1tr
at1sp
a3tra
at1re
at1je2s1
a3tu
at1w
ag1am
a1ga
ag1a2d
ag1av
ag1l
ag1or
ag1oc
a2gem
a1ge
a2gen1te
age2nt
a2g1e2t
ag1s1n
a2gs
ag1sta
ag1ste
agne2me
ag1n
ag1nem
a2gio
a1gi
aggeplaat3
ag1g
ag1ge
agge1p
agge1pl
aggeplaa2
a2g1ru
ag1uu2
a1gu
a1ve
a1vu
a1ra
araat1
araa2
2ara1b
ara1h
arm3ond
ar1mo
ar1ov
ar1op
a1re
a2rei
aret1j
ar2s1l
ar1s1o
a1ri
ar2d1op
ar1do
ar2dr
ard1ri
ard1w
ar2top
ar1to
ar1kl
ar1u
a2f1aa2
a1fa
af1l
a2f1s2
1af1n
af1dr
af1dw
1af1v
af1ran
af1ro
af1re
af1r2it
af1ru
a1ja
a1je
ak1al
a1ka
ak1lo
ak1le
ak1on
a1ko
a2k1een
a1ke
akee2
ak1str
ak1sc
ak1sp
ak1n
ak1to
a2kt
akt1h
ak1ra
ak1um
a1ku
ak1u2r
ak1w
a1co
2a2ce
a3ce2n
ac2ta
a2ct
ac3ti
ac2k1u
a1cho
a1che
a1chi
a1chu
a1ha
a1ho
a1hi
a2h1r
a1hy2
au1sh
au1n
au1t
1au1to
1aug
au1r
ap1le
ap1li
a1plu
a1pe
a2p2e.
ap1so
ap2sc
a1pi
ap1j
a1pu
a1w
a1ya
2l.
1la.
1la2l1
la3me
lamp1j
la1o
la1sa
4land2sex
land1se
lant1j
la2nt
la1ta
la1tr
lat1j
lat1h
la2ga
lag1r
lar2m1i
la1k1i
2lau
lap1r
lay1
1la9ï/=i,3,1
l1l
l2l1p
2lm
l2m1op
l1mo
l2m1e2d
l1me
lm1s2t
l1mu
lm1p
1loa
lo1ac
lo2l
l1omt
l1om1v
loot1
loo2
1lo1z
2lond
lont1j
lo2nt
lot1j
lo1ven
l1org
lo1ru
lok1r
lou3s
l1oud
lo1pe
l1op1h
le2lee2
le1le
lee2
2leeu
le2s1l
les3m
le2s1i
les1ta
les1p
le1na
le1ne
len1sn
le2ns
len1s2t
le1ni
len1tj
le2nt
le2bl
le1b
le2t1r
le1tj
le1go
1le1ra
ler1af
le1ro
ler1kl
le2h
lex1a
2ls
ls1aa2
l1sal
l1sak
l1sau
l1sla
l1slo
ls1le
ls1of
ls1n
l1stat
l1sto
l1ster
l2stek
l1str
l1sc
ls1he
l1sp
l2s1pl
l1sy
l1n
lni2v
lie3la
lie1sp
lie2g1a
lie1ra
li1eu
l1i2s1w
lint1j
li2nt
lin1kl
1libr
li1b
1lid
li1to
l2it
li3te
li1th
li2ve
li1v
lij2st
lij1sp
1lijn
li1kr
li1kw
li1co
ld1om
ld1o2nt
l1dor
lde1na
l1de
l2d1ei
l2d1ec
l2d1ex
ld1sl
ld1sp
ld1re
ld1rij
ld1w
2lt
l1ta
l1to
l2t1o2v
lto1pi
l1te
lt1s2
lti1s
l1ti
l1tr
l1tj
l1tha
lt1ho
lt1hu
l1tu
l1gl
l1go
l2g1s
l3gr
l1v
lves1
2l1r
lf1ana
l1fa
lf1l
l2f1on
l1fo
l2f1end
l1fe
lfs1l
l2fs
lf1sp
lf1ing
l1fi
lf1r
l1j
l2k1and
l1ka
l1kl
l2k1ee2
l1ke
lk1st
l1kn
l1kr
lk1w
2l1c
l1h
l3hi
1lu1a
lu1o1
lu1ne
lu4bl
lu2b
lui3s4t2e.
luis1te
luit3j
lu2it
lu1ta
lu4gi
lu2ka
luks1
luk2st
2lp
l1pa
l1p1ap
l1pl
lp1or
l1pe
l1pi
l1pr
lp1j
l1pu
l1w
1lyg
1ma
3maat
maa2
maar3tj
ma1la
ma1lu
ma1na
ma1no
ma1nu
3maild
mai2l
ma1i2s.
mais2
ma1tr
mat1j
ma1th
ma1ro
2maf
ma1j
ma1kr
m2a3ce
ma1he
ma1hu
mau1
ma1y
m1l
m1m
1mo
mo1la
moo3tj
moo2
mo1sta
mo1na
mo1no
m1onts
mo2nt
mot1j
mo1v
mo1ra
mo1ro
mor2s
mor1s3te
mors2t
2mop
3mop1l
1me
me2lek
me1le
3meo
meo1p
me1sto
2me1sh
me1sp
me1na
me1ne
me1ni
2mengel
men1ge
2me1b
3mei
met1s
me1tj
me1th
me1ra
me1ro
2mers1k
3merk
2mep
me1pa2
m1sl
m1s2m
ms1o
ms2t
ms3taa2
m1sto
m1ste
m1s1ti
m1str
ms2ka
ms1k
m1sc
m1sp
m1sy
mze2
m1z
m1n
1mi
mies1
mis1p
3mid1d2
mi1d1j
mi1tr
m2it
mi1ra
mi1c
m1do
m1dr
m1ta
m1to
mto1pi
m1te
mte1st
m1tes
m1tr
m1g
mge1n
m1ge
m1v
mves1
m1r
m1f
mfo1l
m1fo
m1j
m1k
m1co
m1ce2
mcel1
m1h
m2hi
mum1
1mue
mu1sa
3mu1z
mun2
mu1ni
1mug
1muë
m1pa
mp1ach
m1pac
m1pl
m1po
m3pe
mpe3k
mp1s
m1pi
m1pr
m1pu
m1w
1my
1mé
o1al1b
o1a1z
o1af
o1ah
ola2m
ol1ac
o1lo
ol1op
o1le
o3l2e.
ole1st
o3len
ole1u
ol1sl
o2ls
ol1sta
ol1ste
ols1h
o1lio
o1lin
ol1th
o2lt
o1lu
o2l1ui
om1arm
o1ma
o2m1af
2om1m
o2m1op
o1mo
o3men
o1me
oment3j
ome2nt
om1sta
oms2t
o3mi
1om1dr
1om1r
o1mu
ool1a
oo3le
oo3li
oo3mer
oo1me
oom1p
oon1a
oon1o
oon1tj
oo2nt
oo1d1i
ood1r
oo1t1a
oo3te
oo1g1r
oor1a2
oor1o
oo1r1i
oor2d3aa2
oor1da
oor2ta
oor1tj
oo1k1o
ook1s
oo3c
oop1a2
oo3pe
oe2l1ei
oe1le
oe1sp
oe2no
oe1ne
oen1tj
oe2nt
oei1s
oe2d1ar
oe1da
oe2d1on
oe1do
oe2dr
oed1ri
oed1w
oe2tri
oe1tr
oeg1l
oe1go
oe1ras
oe1rak
oe1roe
oer2s2t
oer1k
oe2fa
oe2fi
oe3ki
oek1r
oe2ku
oe2pl
oe1pi
os1aa2
o1s1at
os1lo
os1li
o1so
os1no
os1tal
os1te
os1tu
o1s2fe
os1f
os2cr
o1sho
os1he
os1pa
o1spo
os1pi
os1pr
o1sy
o1nal
on1ac
o1nau
on1on
on1ov
on1of
on1ou
o1ne
on1eet1
on1eni
one2n
on1ei
on1e2v
on1er1v
on1ef
on1ec
o2ne1w
on1s1le
o2ns
on1s1m
on1s2t
onne1s
on1n
o1ni
on1id
on2dac
on1da
on1dol
ond1om
onder3a
on1de
on2dij
on1di
ond1ri
ont3aar
o2nt
on1ta
ontaa2
on3to
on2t1re
on1tr
ont1h
ont1w
on1gl
on1gr
on2ka
on1kr
on1c
on1ui
oi1en
oi1e1v
oi1er
ois2t
oi1s1te
oi2nt1
oi1tj
o2it
o1do
od1re
od1ri
o1d1ru
od1w
o1dy1
o1ta
o1to
ot1ou
o1te
ote1a
ot1so2
ot1ste
ot1sp
ot1r
o1th
ot1ha
ot1hu
o1tu
ot1w
o2g1a2l
o1ga
og1ar
og1l
og1ov
og1op
og1sta
o2gs
og1ste
og1s1p
o1gr
og1ui
o1gu
o1va
o1vo
o2ve3rin
ove1ri
2o1vi
or1av
or1af
or2m1ac
or1ma
or1oo2
or1ov
or1op
o1re
or3se
or1sn
o1ri
or2daa2
or1da
or2d1oo2
or1do
or2dor
or2den1v
or1de
ord1w
or2tom
or1to
or2top
or2g2e.
or1ge
or1kw
or1ui
or1u2r
orp2
o1ry
of1l
of1sm
o2fs
of2d1a
ofd1r
of1ro
o1j
o2k1aas
o1ka
okaa2
o2kl
ok1li
ok1lu
ok1ol
o1ko
o2ko1pe
ok1ei
o1ke
o3ker
ok1sa
ok1to
o2kt
ok1ru
ok1w
o1co
o1che
o1chi
o1chu
o1ha
o1ho
o1he
ou1so
ou2se
oun2g
ou1is
out1r
out1j
our1o
our2sc
ou1c
o1p1am
op1a2t.
o1par
op1l
op1on
op1of
o1pea
o1pel
op1een
op1eet
op1ei
op1e2t
o1pec
op1sa
op1sl
op1so
op1sn
1opna
op1n
o1pie
opi1er
o1pis
op1i2n.
op1ra
op1re
op1ru
op1j
op1h
o1pu
op1ui
o1wa
o1we
o1wi
oy1an
2e.
e1aa2
ea2l1s
e1a1li
ea2m
ea2s
ea3so
e1a2n
e2a2n.
ea3ne
eang1
e1a1b
e1ai
ea2d
ea3der
ea1de
ead1s
e1at
e1ag
e1av
e1ar1c
e1af
e1ac
e1ap
e1la
e1l1a2l1
e2la2nt
el1a2ct
e2l1au
e1lo
e2l1ond
el1o2nt
e2lor
e1le
eles1t
el1eis
el1so
e2ls
el1ste
el1sh
e1li
e3lig
e1lu
el1po
e2lp
e1ly1
e3moe
e1mo
em1s2t
e1mu
3emplaa2
em1pl
em1pj
eolo4ge
eo1lo
e1om1
e1oo2
e1oe
eo1s
e1o1si
e1on
eo1i
e1od
e1or
eo1ro
e2or1ge
e1of
eo1p1l
eo3pen2d.
eo1pr
ee1a
ee2l1a
ee2l1o
eel1st
ee2ls
ee2mon
ee1mo
ee2mu
ee1o
eee2
e1eet
ee1eg
ee1s1i
eest1a
ees1te
ees1te2r
ee1sho
ees1pl
ee1spe
ee1spr
een1tj
ee2nt
1een1v
1een1j
een1k
ee2t1ap
ee1ta
eet1s
ee2t1i
eeg1l
ee2g1r
eer1a
ee1roo2
eer1on
ee1rot
ee1r2o1v
ee1rou
eer1k
ee2f
ee2k
ee3kla
ee1kl
eek1en
ee1ke
eek1re
eek1w
es1al
esam1
es1ac
es1ap
e1sl
e2s1lij
es2m
es3ma
es3mi
es1om
es1oo2
esent3j
e1se
ese2nt
e2s1ex
es2s2l
e2s1s
es2sn
e1sn
e2si.
e1si
e2s1il
e2s1i2ns
es1tam
es3ta2nt
e2st1ac
e2s3t2e.
es3te1le
es1ten
e2s3te2n.
es1ter
e2stie
es1ti
es1the
e2sth
es3je
e1sc
es1ha
es1he
es1hi2
es1hu
e3su
es1pen
e1spi
es1pri
es2wa
e2s1w
eze3s1
e1z
en1a2l.
en1a2ls
e1nan
e1nat
en1av
en1ars
en1a2kt
en1ac
e2n1m
e1noo2
e2n1oor
e1noe
e1nod
en1ord
en1of
en1ok
en1oc
en1ou
e1nee
e1nes
en1en1z
ene2n
en1e2nt
en1en1v
en1ei
1energ
e2nec
en1ech
e1neu
e1nep
en1soo2
e2ns
ens1on
en1sp
1enze2s1
en1z
1enze1v
1en3ne1g
en1n
en1i2n.
e1nin
e1ni1v
en3do
en2ded
en1de
en1dri
1entac
e2nt
en1ta
en1th
en1t1wo
en1gr
3envee
en1v
1envij
en1vi
en1kl
en1kr
en1ui
e1nut
en1uu2
eba2le
e1b
ebe1a
ebij2
ei1a
ei1e
ei1spr
ein1tj
ei2nt
ei1do
2eigd
ei1r
eij2
e3dap
e1da
e1do
e2d1ov
ede1st
e1de
eder3du
ed1sp
e2d1i2ns
e1di
e1dr
e3dra
e1ta
e2t1ad
e2tag
e2t1av
et1ac
e2tap
e1to
e1te
eten3tj
ete2nt
ete1ra
et1sl
ets1o2
et1sto
et1sh
et1su2
et1spo
e1tr
et1rin
e1tu
et1we
ega2m
e1ga
eg1lo
eg1ou
eg1sl
e2gs
eg1st
eg1sc
e1gr
e2g1ru
eg1u2r
e1gu
e1v
ev4en
eve2n1t
evie3re
e1vi
evie2r
e1ra.
e1raad
eraa2
er1am.
e3r2an1da
e1rang
e1r2an1c
e1rai
e1rat
era2g
er1avo
er1a2f.
er1ac
er1ah
er1oli
er1om
er1oe1v
e1ro2n.
er1o2nt
e1rod
er1ov
er1or
e1rok
er1oc
er1op
er2op1g
e1re
e2r1een
er1eil
e2r1eig
er1ef1f
er1s1mi
ers2m
er2s1e2t
er1se
e1ri
er1ind
er1i2nt
e3rig
e3rif
e2r1ijs
er1ij1z
e3rik
er3do
er1dw
er1th
er1t1w
er1gl
er2c2e.
er1c
er1ce
e1ru
erug1
er1u2r
1er2wt
er1w
e1ry
ef1les
ef1om
e1fo
ef1sl
e2fs
ef1sp
ef1ij
e1fi
e1fu
e1j
e3kal
e1ka
e3kan
e1kl
ek1ly
e2k1een
e1ke
ekee2
ek1ei
e3ker
ekeu4r
ekeur3i2g.
ekeu1ri
ek1so
ek1str
ek1sh
e1kn
ek1tr
e2kt
e3kra
ek1u2r
e1ku
ek1uu2
e1cor
e1cha
e1che
e1chu
e1h
e3ho
e1umt
eu1ne
eu1ni
eun1tj
eu2nt
1eud
eu1tr
eut1j
eug2d1r
eu1roo2
euro1p
1eux
e1pa
e1pl
eplaats4
eplaa2
e1po
e1pe
eper1s3te
e1pers
epers2t
ep2s1p
e1pr
ep1j
e1pu
e1w
ey1a
eys2
2s.
1sa.
1saag
saa2
sa3la
1sas1
sa1na
sant1j
sa2nt
1sai
s1adr
1sat
sa1ta
s1at1t
s1av
s1arm
sa2re
s1ar1b
sa2ca
sa1pa
sap2s
sa1pr
1sa9ë/=e,3,1
1slaa2
s1lam
s1las
2s1lat
1slag
s1loos
sloo2
2s1lo1z
s1les
s1lei
s1le1v
1slief
1slin
s1lig
2slij
s1lijs
s2lik
2s1lic
1slui
s1luc
s3man
s1ma
1smad
s2mom
s1mo
1smee
s1me
s3men
2smu
1so.
so1la
so1li
s1om1k
s1ook
soo2
so1na
s1o2n2t1
son1te2
2song
1sod
s1o2g
s1ov
1so2r.
1sok
sou1t
2sop
s1op1l
s1op1g
3sop1j
s1op1k
1se
sel1ac
se1la
se2lem
se1le
3se2s.
se1sa
se1st
2se1sc
3se2n.
se1na
sen1sl
se2ns
se1ni
sen1tw
se2nt
sen1u
2seis
s1eig
se2t
s1e1te
set1j
se1ra
se3ri
se1um
2sex
2s1s
ss2l
s2sm
s3se
sse2n1t
ss1ni
s3si
ss2t
ss2f
2s1z
1snap
sno1v
s1net
sbui1
s1b
1si
si1am
sie1sp
sie1ra
sis1o
sis1p
2si2ns
2sind
2s1in1f
sin1k2
si3di
3s2it
3sig
si1r
si1co
s1d
2s2t.
staar3tj
staa2
s3ta1li
1stas
1sta2n.
1stav
st1ar1b
2stac
st1ach
stoot3j
stoo2
2s3toe1s
2st1oef
1stof
1stok
ste1na
ste2nar
2ste2nt
1sted
3ste1v
ster3e2s.
ste1re
3steris2c2h.
ste1ri
2st1s
2st1ijs
s1ti
2stij1v
st1ga2
st1g
str2aat3j
straa2
st3rol1l
st1rec
st1r2it
1stru
st1j
2sth
st1ha
st1ho
st1hi
st1hu
2stun
1stud
1stuk
2st1w
2s1g
sge1n
s1ge
2s1v
sve2
svie3
s1vi
2s1r
s1f
s1jou
s1je
3s2jer
sj2k
s1ju
s1k
1s2ki.
s1ki
s2k1j
s2can
s1ca
2s1cl
2s1co.
2s1com
2s1ce
2s1ci
1sche
s1hal
s1hol
s1hoo2
s1hoe
s1hon
s1hof
s1hok
s1hou
1show
1shen
s1hei
s1hed
she2r
shi2
s2us1
2s1un
2sp.
s2pa2n
2spak
2spla
s2pli
s1pos
2s1pers
s1ps
1spra
2s1w
sy1no
1z
2z.
za2k1l
za1cha
zo1a
zo1la
zoog1
zoo2
zoet1s
zoet1j
zo2ns1
zo1ie
zo1d
zo1v
zo1ra
zor2g1a
zo1f
zo1p
zel2v
zel2f
zee3l
zee2re
zee3k
ze2s1
zen1o
ze1nos
ze1ni
ze2n1t
zen1k
ze2t1a
ze1t1r
zet1j
zev4en1
ze1v
ze1ro
4zers2t
ze1c
2z1z
zie1k1l
zie1k1i
zi1ne1
zin2si
zi2ns
z2it1
2z1t
2zr
2zj
zus1
2z1p
z2w
2n.
1na.
1naam
naa2
n1aan
1naat1
1naa2r.
1n2aars
2n1aard
1naart
na1la
1na2lt
n1alf
1nam
2n1am1b
1nas
na1sl
na1str
na1sc
na1sp
1na1z
1nai
1nad
n1ad1v
nat1s
